Massachusetts, session 194th, S708.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 176O of the Massachusetts general laws is hereby
amended by inserting the following new definition: -
“Serious mental illness,” any of the following conditions, as defined by the most recent
edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders:
(1) Bipolar disorders, hypomanic, manic, depressive, and mixed.
(2) Childhood and adolescent depression.
(3) Major depressive disorders, single episode or recurrent.
(4) Obsessive-compulsive disorders.
(5) Paranoid personality disorder and other psychotic disorders.
(6) Schizo-affective disorders, bipolar or depressive.
of 3

(7) Schizophrenia.
(8) Post-traumatic stress disorder.
SECTION 2. Section 12A of said Chapter 176O is hereby further amended by inserting
after subsection (g) the following new subsection:-
(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a carrier or utilization review
organization shall not, with respect to a drug approved by the Food and Drug Administration for
the treatment of serious mental illness, impose a prior authorization requirement, step therapy
protocol, or any other protocol that could restrict or delay the dispensing of the drug.
SECTION 3. Section 8 of Chapter 118E of the Massachusetts general laws is hereby
amended by inserting therein the following new definition:-
i½. “Serious mental illness”, any of the following conditions, as defined by the most
recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders:
(1) Bipolar disorders, hypomanic, manic, depressive, and mixed.
(2) Childhood and adolescent depression.
(3) Major depressive disorders, single episode or recurrent.
(4) Obsessive-compulsive disorders.
(5) Paranoid personality disorder and other psychotic disorders.
(6) Schizo-affective disorders, bipolar or depressive.
(7) Schizophrenia.
of 3

(8) Post-traumatic stress disorder.
SECTION 4. Section 51A of said chapter 118E is hereby further amended by inserting
after subsection (f) the following new subsection: -
(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the division or an entity with which the
division contracts to provide or manage health insurance benefits shall not, with respect to a drug
approved by the Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of serious mental illness,
impose a prior authorization requirement, step therapy protocol, or any other protocol that could
restrict or delay the dispensing of the drug.
of 3